test/tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/fstspeller-gt-norm-yamls/CmpN-tests_fstspeller-gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen:  ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/generator-fstspeller-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/analyser-fstspeller-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen:  ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/generator-fstspeller-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/analyser-fstspeller-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Default tests:
   boallo+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp#rájgge+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [boallo#rájgge, ~boalo#rájgge, ~boaloj#rájgge]

#  CmpN/Sg tests:
  
  CmpN/SgN tests:
    giella+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp#miella+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [giella#miella, ~gielamiella, ~gielajmiella]
    sámpal+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp#skirtto+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [sámpal#skirtto, ~sámmpalaskirtto, ~sámmpalijskirtto]   
      
  CmpN/SgG tests:
    fránsska+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp#giella+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [fránska#giella, ~fránskaj#giella]

  CmpN/PlG tests:
    allelahá+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp#sijdda+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [allelaháj#sijdda, ~allelij#sijdda]
    oarbbenattja+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp#sijdda+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: oarbbenattjaj#sijdda
     
#  CmpN/SgLeft tests:
  
  CmpN/SgNomLeft tests:
    beraj+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp#namma+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [beraj#namma, berraha#namma, ~berrahij#namma] #namma: CmpN/SgNomLeft and CmpN/SgGenLeft
    áhttje+N+Sem/Hum+Cmp#rávkke+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [áhttje#rávkke, ~áhtje#rávkke, ~áhtjij#rávkke] #rávkke: +CmpN/SgNomLeft    
    
#  CmpN/SgGenLeft tests:

  CmpN/PlGenLeft tests:
    goahte+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp#gasska+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [goahte#gasska, ~goade#gasska, gådij#gasska] #gasska: CmpN/SgNomLeft and CmpN/PlGenLeft
    spánsska+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp#gasska+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [spánsska#gasska, ~spánska#gasska, spánskaj#gasska]

#  CmpN/DefSgGen tests:
#
#  CmpN/DefPlGen tests:
   
